Hawaii statutes.
[§328C-3] Sale of donated
pharmaceuticals or health care supplies, prohibited; fines. (a) No person
or organization shall sell, or offer for sale, any pharmaceutical or health
care supply donated or distributed under this chapter.

(b) Any violation of this section is
punishable by a fine not to exceed $1,000. [L 1997, c 337, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next